District of Columbia statutes.
29-404.10

Differences in rights and obligations of members.

Except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, each member of a membership corporation shall have the same rights and obligations as every other member with respect to voting, dissolution, membership transfer, and other matters.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-408.22.